District of Columbia statutes.
29-1003.01

Organizers.

A limited cooperative association shall be organized by one or more organizers.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 301 of the Uniform Limited Cooperative Association Act.